Utah statutes.
16-17-203.   Appointment of registered agent.

(1)  A registered agent filing shall state:

(a)  the name of the represented entity's commercial registered agent; or

(b)  if the entity does not have a commercial registered agent:

(i)  the name and address of the entity's noncommercial registered agent; or

(ii)  the title of an office or other position with the entity if service of process is to be sent to the person holding that office or position, and the address of the business office of that person.

(2)  The appointment of a registered agent pursuant to Subsection (1)(a) or (b)(i) is an affirmation by the represented entity that the agent has consented to serve as such.

(3)  The division shall make available in a record as soon as practicable a daily list of filings that contain the name of a registered agent.  The list shall:

(a)  be available for at least 14 calendar days;

(b)  list in alphabetical order the names of the registered agents; and

(c)  state the type of filing and name of the represented entity making the filing.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

